Arkansas, session 2025, HB1408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-56-309. Medical marijuana — Health savings account — Flexible
spending account — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Flexible spending account" means a medical expense flexible
spending account in conjunction with a cafeteria plan as permitted under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and
(2) "Health savings account" means an account established by an
individual under a medical care savings account program to pay the eligible
medical expenses of a qualifying patient under a policy of individual or
group health insurance coverage that satisfies the criteria for a high-
deductible health plan under 26 U.S.C. § 223, as it existed on January 1,
*ANS216*
02/05/2025 9:33:17 AM ANS216

HB1408
2025.
(b) A qualifying patient or designated caregiver under Arkansas
Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, may
use a flexible spending account or a health savings account to purchase
medical marijuana.































02/05/2025 9:33:17 AM ANS216